Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 61 Rhode Island Public Telecommunications Authority
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-61-1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 4; Repealed by P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

16-61-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 4; Repealed by P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

16-61-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 4; P.L. 2006, ch. 14, § 7; P.L. 2006, ch. 16, § 7; Repealed by P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

16-61-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 4; P.L. 1982, ch. 441, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 56; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 21, § 19; P.L. 2006, ch. 14, § 7; P.L. 2006, ch. 16, § 7; Repealed by P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

16-61-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 4; Repealed by P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

16-61-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 4; P.L. 1986, ch. 287, art. 8, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 14, § 7; P.L. 2006, ch. 16, § 7; P.L. 2006, ch. 590, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

16-61-6.2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 590, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

16-61-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 4; P.L. 1986, ch. 287, art. 8, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

16-61-8.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 4; Repealed by P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

16-61-8.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 571, § 4; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 56; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 8, § 4; Repealed by P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

16-61-9.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 4; Repealed by P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

16-61-10.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 4; Repealed by P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

16-61-11.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 4; Repealed by P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

16-61-12.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 4; P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 50, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 14, § 7; P.L. 2006, ch. 16, § 7; Repealed by P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

16-61-13.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 4; Repealed by P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

16-61-14.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 4; Repealed by P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

16-61-15.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 4; Repealed by P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.